Utah statutes.
62A-4a-1007.   False reports -- Penalties.

(1)  The division shall send a certified letter to any person who submits a report of abuse or neglect that is placed into or included in any part of the Management Information System, if the division determines, at the conclusion of its investigation, that:

(a)  the report is false;

(b)  it is more likely than not that the person knew the report was false at the time that person submitted the report; and

(c)  the reporting person's address is known or reasonably available.

(2)  The letter shall inform the reporting person of:

(a)  the division's determination made under Subsection (1);

(b)  the penalty for submitting false information under Section 76-8-506 and other applicable laws; and

(c)  the obligation of the division to inform law enforcement and the person alleged to have committed abuse or neglect:

(i)  in the present instance if law enforcement considers an immediate referral of the reporting person to law enforcement to be justified by the facts; or

(ii)  if the reporting person submits a subsequent false report involving the same alleged perpetrator or victim.

(3)  The division may inform law enforcement and the alleged perpetrator of a report for which a letter is required to be sent under Subsection (1), if an immediate referral is justified by the facts.

(4)  The division shall inform law enforcement and the alleged perpetrator of a report for which a letter is required to be sent under Subsection (1) if a second letter is sent to the reporting person involving the same alleged perpetrator or victim.

(5)  The division shall determine, in consultation with law enforcement:

(a)  what information should be given to an alleged perpetrator relating to a false report; and

(b)  whether good cause exists, as defined by the division by rule, for not informing an alleged perpetrator about a false report.

(6)  Nothing in this section may be construed as requiring the division to conduct an investigation beyond what is described in Subsection (1), to determine whether or not a report is false.

